Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Common Interest Communities

38-33.3-201.
Creation of common interest communities.

A common interest community may be created pursuant to this article only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed and, in a cooperative, by conveying the real estate subject to that declaration to the association. The declaration must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the common interest community is located and must be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the common interest community and in the name of the association and in the grantor’s index in the name of each person executing the declaration. No common interest community is created until the plat or map for the common interest community is recorded.

In a common interest community with horizontal unit boundaries, a declaration, or an amendment to a declaration, creating or adding units shall include a certificate of completion executed by an independent licensed or registered engineer, surveyor, or architect stating that all structural components of all buildings containing or comprising any units thereby created are substantially completed.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1715, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 646, § 8, effective April 30.

38-33.3-202.
Unit boundaries.

Except as provided by the declaration:

If walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, all lath, furring, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, and finished flooring and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces thereof are a part of the unit, and all other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements.

If any chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated boundaries of a unit, any portion thereof serving only that unit is a limited common element allocated solely to that unit, and any portion thereof serving more than one unit or any portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), all spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of the unit.

Any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, and patios and all exterior doors and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single unit, but located outside the unit’s boundaries, are limited common elements allocated exclusively to that unit.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1715, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-203.
Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

All provisions of the declaration and bylaws are severable.

The rule against perpetuities does not apply to defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations.

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails, except to the extent the declaration is inconsistent with this article.

Title to a unit and common elements is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with this article. Whether a substantial failure impairs marketability is not affected by this article.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1716, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-204.
Description of units.

A description of a unit may set forth the name of the common interest community, the recording data for the declaration, the county in which the common interest community is located, and the identifying number of the unit. Such description is a legally sufficient description of that unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit which were created by the declaration or bylaws. It shall not be necessary to use the term “unit” as a part of a legally sufficient description of a unit.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1716, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2181, § 51, effective June 2.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 647, § 9, effective April 30.

38-33.3-205.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration must contain:

The names of the common interest community and the association and a statement that the common interest community is a condominium, cooperative, or planned community;

The name of every county in which any part of the common interest community is situated;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the common interest community;

A statement of the maximum number of units that the declarant reserves the right to create;

In a condominium or planned community, a description, which may be by plat or map, of the boundaries of each unit created by the declaration, including the unit’s identifying number; or, in a cooperative, a description, which may be by plat or map, of each unit created by the declaration, including the unit’s identifying number, its size or number of rooms, and its location within a building if it is within a building containing more than one unit;

A description of any limited common elements, other than those specified in section 38-33.3-202 (1)(b) and (1)(d) or shown on the map as provided in section 38-33.3-209 (2)(j) and, in a planned community, any real estate that is or must become common elements;

A description of any real estate, except real estate subject to development rights, that may be allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than limited common elements specified in section 38-33.3-202 (1)(b) and (1)(d), together with a statement that they may be so allocated;

A description of any development rights and other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant, together with a description sufficient to identify the real estate to which each of those rights applies and the time limit within which each of those rights must be exercised;

If any development right may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate at different times, a statement to that effect together with:

Either a statement fixing the boundaries of those portions and regulating the order in which those portions may be subjected to the exercise of each development right or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards; and

A statement as to whether, if any development right is exercised in any portion of the real estate subject to that development right, that development right must be exercised in all or in any other portion of the remainder of that real estate;

Any other conditions or limitations under which the rights described in paragraph (h) of this subsection (1) may be exercised or will lapse;

An allocation to each unit of the allocated interests in the manner described in section 38-33.3-207;

Any restrictions on the use, occupancy, and alienation of the units and on the amount for which a unit may be sold or on the amount that may be received by a unit owner on sale, condemnation, or casualty loss to the unit or to the common interest community or on termination of the common interest community;

The recording data for recorded easements and licenses appurtenant to, or included in, the common interest community or to which any portion of the common interest community is or may become subject by virtue of a reservation in the declaration;

All matters required by sections 38-33.3-201, 38-33.3-206 to 38-33.3-209, 38-33.3-215, 38-33.3-216, and 38-33.3-303 (4);

Reasonable provisions concerning the manner in which notice of matters affecting the common interest community may be given to unit owners by the association or other unit owners;

A statement, if applicable, that the planned community is a large planned community and is exercising certain exemptions from the “Colorado Common Interest Ownership Act” as such a large planned community;

In a large planned community:

A general description of every common element that the declarant is legally obligated to construct within the large planned community together with the approximate date by which each such common element is to be completed. The declarant shall be required to complete each such common element within a reasonable time after the date specified in the declaration, unless the declarant, due to an act of God, is unable to do so. The declarant shall not be legally obligated with respect to any common element not identified in the declaration.

A general description of the type of any common element that the declarant anticipates may be constructed by, maintained by, or operated by the association. The association shall not assess members for the construction, maintenance, or operation of any common element that is not described pursuant to this subparagraph (II) unless such assessment is approved by the vote of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast in person or by proxy, other than by declarant, at a meeting duly convened as required by law.

The declaration may contain any other matters the declarant considers appropriate.

The plats and maps described in section 38-33.3-209 may contain certain information required to be included in the declaration by this section.

A declarant may amend the declaration, a plat, or a map to correct clerical, typographical, or technical errors.

A declarant may amend the declaration to comply with the requirements, standards, or guidelines of recognized secondary mortgage markets, the department of housing and urban development, the federal housing administration, the veterans administration, the federal home loan mortgage corporation, the government national mortgage association, or the federal national mortgage association.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1716, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1)(h) and (1)(n) amended, p. 647, § 10, effective April 30.

L. 94:

(1)(p) added, p. 2847, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(q) added, p. 237, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(h) amended and (4) and (5) added, p. 480, § 4, effective July 1.

38-33.3-206.
Leasehold common interest communities.

Any lease, the expiration or termination of which may terminate the common interest community or reduce its size, must be recorded. In a leasehold condominium or leasehold planned community, the declaration must contain the signature of each lessor of any such lease in order for the provisions of this section to be effective. The declaration must state:

The recording data for the lease;

The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;

Any rights of the unit owners to redeem the reversion and the manner whereby those rights may be exercised or state that they do not have those rights;

Any rights of the unit owners to remove any improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease or state that they do not have those rights; and

Any rights of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of any renewal or state that they do not have those rights.

After the declaration for a leasehold condominium or leasehold planned community is recorded, neither the lessor nor the lessor’s successor in interest may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit owner who makes timely payment of a unit owner’s share of the rent and otherwise complies with all covenants which, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. A unit owner’s leasehold interest in a condominium or planned community is not affected by failure of any other person to pay rent or fulfill any other covenant.

Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any unit owner by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests unless the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a common interest community, the allocated interests shall be reallocated in accordance with section 38-33.3-107 (1), as though those units had been taken by eminent domain. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1718, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-207.
Allocation of allocated interests.

The declaration must allocate to each unit:

In a condominium, a fraction or percentage of undivided interests in the common elements and in the common expenses of the association and, to the extent not allocated in the bylaws of the association, a portion of the votes in the association;

In a cooperative, an ownership interest in the association, a fraction or percentage of the common expenses of the association, and, to the extent not allocated in the bylaws of the association, a portion of the votes in the association;

In a planned community, a fraction or percentage of the common expenses of the association and, to the extent not allocated in the bylaws of the association, a portion of the votes in the association; except that, in a large planned community, the common expenses of the association may be paid from assessments and allocated as set forth in the declaration and the votes in the association may be allocated as set forth in the declaration.

The declaration must state the formulas used to establish allocations of interests. Those allocations may not discriminate in favor of units owned by the declarant or an affiliate of the declarant.

If units may be added to or withdrawn from the common interest community, the declaration must state the formulas to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among all units included in the common interest community after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide:

That different allocations of votes shall be made to the units on particular matters specified in the declaration;

For cumulative voting only for the purpose of electing members of the executive board;

For class voting on specified issues affecting the class, including the election of the executive board; and

For assessments including, but not limited to, assessments on retail sales and services not to exceed six percent of the amount charged for the retail sale or service, and real estate transfers not to exceed three percent of the real estate sales price or its equivalent.

A declarant may not utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by this article, nor may units constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

Assessments allowed under subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be entitled to the lien provided for under section 38-33.3-316 (1) but shall not be entitled to the priority established by section 38-33.3-316 (2)(b).

Communities with classes for voting specified in the declaration as allowed pursuant to subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) may designate classes of members on a reasonable basis which do not allow the declarant to control the association beyond the period provided for in section 38-33.3-303, including, without limitation, residence owners, commercial space owners, and owners of lodging space and to elect members to the association executive board from such classes.

Except for minor variations due to the rounding of fractions or percentages, the sum of the common expense liabilities and, in a condominium, the sum of the undivided interests in the common elements allocated at any time to all the units shall each equal one if stated as fractions or one hundred percent if stated as percentages. In the event of discrepancy between an allocated interest and the result derived from application of the pertinent formula, the allocated interest prevails.

In a condominium, the common elements are not subject to partition except as allowed for in section 38-33.3-312, and any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an undivided interest in the common elements not allowed for in section 38-33.3-312, that is made without the unit to which that interest is allocated is void.

In a cooperative, any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an ownership interest in the association made without the possessory interest in the unit to which that interest is related is void.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1719, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 647, § 11, effective April 30.

L. 94:

(1)(c) and (4)(a) amended and (4)(c) and (4)(d) added, p. 2847, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4)(a)(IV) amended, p. 238, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(4)(a)(III), (4)(a)(IV), and (4)(d) amended, p. 480, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(6) amended, p. 767, § 3, effective August 7.

38-33.3-208.
Limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in section 38-33.3-202 (1)(b) and (1)(d), the declaration shall specify to which unit or units each limited common element is allocated. That allocation may not be altered without the consent of the unit owners whose units are affected.

Subject to any provisions of the declaration, a limited common element may be reallocated between or among units after compliance with the procedure set forth in this subsection (2). In order to reallocate limited common elements between or among units, the unit owners of those units, as the applicants, must submit an application for approval of the proposed reallocation to the executive board, which application shall be executed by those unit owners and shall include:

The proposed form for an amendment to the declaration as may be necessary to show the reallocation of limited common elements between or among units;

A deposit against attorney fees and costs which the association will incur in reviewing and effectuating the application, in an amount reasonably estimated by the executive board; and

Such other information as may be reasonably requested by the executive board. No reallocation shall be effective without the approval of the executive board. The reallocation shall be effectuated by an amendment signed by the association and by those unit owners between or among whose units the reallocation is made, which amendment shall be recorded as provided in section 38-33.3-217 (3). All costs and attorney fees incurred by the association as a result of the application shall be the sole obligation of the applicants.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element may be so allocated only pursuant to provisions in the declaration made in accordance with section 38-33.3-205 (1)(g). The allocations must be made by amendments to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the declarant.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1720, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-209.
Plats and maps.

A plat or map is a part of the declaration and is required for all common interest communities except cooperatives. A map is required only for a common interest community with units having a horizontal boundary. The requirements of this section shall be deemed satisfied so long as all of the information required by this section is contained in the declaration, a map or a plat, or some combination of any two or all of the three. Each plat or map must be clear and legible. When a map is required under any provision of this article, the map, a plat, or the declaration shall contain a certification that all information required by this section is contained in the declaration, the map or a plat, or some combination of any two or all of the three.

In addition to meeting the requirements of a land survey plat as set forth in section 38-51-106, each map shall show the following, except to the extent such information is contained in the declaration or on a plat:

The name and a general schematic plan of the entire common interest community;

The location and dimensions of all real estate not subject to development rights, or subject only to the development right to withdraw, and the location and dimensions of all existing improvements within that real estate;

A legally sufficient description, which may be of the whole common interest community or any portion thereof, of any real estate subject to development rights and a description of the rights applicable to such real estate;

The extent of any existing encroachments across any common interest community boundary;

To the extent feasible, a legally sufficient description of all easements serving or burdening any portion of the common interest community;

The location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit and that unit’s identifying number;

The location, with reference to established data, of the horizontal boundaries of each unit and that unit’s identifying number;

Any units in which the declarant has reserved the right to create additional units or common elements, identified appropriately;

A legally sufficient description of any real estate in which the unit owners will own only an estate for years;

The distance between noncontiguous parcels of real estate comprising the common interest community; and

The approximate location and dimensions of limited common elements, including porches, balconies, and patios, other than the limited common elements described in section 38-33.3-202 (1)(b) and (1)(d).

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 93, p. 648, § 12, effective April 30, 1993.)

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2007, p. 1799, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.)

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the horizontal boundaries of any part of a unit located outside of a building have the same elevation as the horizontal boundaries of the inside part and need not be depicted on the plats and maps.

Upon exercising any development right, the declarant shall record an amendment to the declaration with respect to that real estate reflecting change as a result of such exercise necessary to conform to the requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section or new certifications of maps previously recorded if those maps otherwise conform to the requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section.

Any certification of a map required by this article must be made by a registered land surveyor.

The requirements of a plat or map under this article shall not be deemed to satisfy any subdivision platting requirement enacted by a county or municipality pursuant to section 30-28-133, C.R.S., part 1 of article 23 of title 31, C.R.S., or a similar provision of a home rule city, nor shall the plat or map requirements under this article be deemed to be incorporated into any subdivision platting requirements enacted by a county or municipality.

Any plat or map that was recorded on or after July 1, 1998, but prior to July 1, 2007, and that satisfies the requirements of this section in effect on July 1, 2007, is deemed to have satisfied the requirements of this section at the time it was recorded.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1721, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(2)(a), (2)(f), (2)(g), (3), and (4)(b) amended, p. 648, § 12, effective April 30.

L. 94:

IP(2) amended, p. 1510, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 97:

IP(2) amended, p. 151, § 3, effective March 28.

L. 98:

(1), IP(2), (6), and (7) amended, p. 480, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1), (2), and (4) amended and (9) added, p. 1799, § 1, effective July 1.

38-33.3-209.4.
Public disclosures required - identity of association - agent - manager - contact information.

Within ninety days after assuming control from the declarant pursuant to section 38-33.3-303 (5), the association shall make the following information available to unit owners upon reasonable notice in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. In addition, if the association’s address, designated agent, or management company changes, the association shall make updated information available within ninety days after the change:

The name of the association;

The name of the association’s designated agent or management company, if any;

A valid physical address and telephone number for both the association and the designated agent or management company, if any;

The name of the common interest community;

The initial date of recording of the declaration; and

The reception number or book and page for the main document that constitutes the declaration.

Within ninety days after assuming control from the declarant pursuant to section 38-33.3-303 (5), and within ninety days after the end of each fiscal year thereafter, the association shall make the following information available to unit owners upon reasonable notice in accordance with subsection (3) of this section:

The date on which its fiscal year commences;

Its operating budget for the current fiscal year;

A list, by unit type, of the association’s current assessments, including both regular and special assessments;

Its annual financial statements, including any amounts held in reserve for the fiscal year immediately preceding the current annual disclosure;

The results of its most recent available financial audit or review;

A list of all association insurance policies, including, but not limited to, property, general liability, association director and officer professional liability, and fidelity policies. Such list shall include the company names, policy limits, policy deductibles, additional named insureds, and expiration dates of the policies listed.

All the association’s bylaws, articles, and rules and regulations;

The minutes of the executive board and member meetings for the fiscal year immediately preceding the current annual disclosure; and

The association’s responsible governance policies adopted under section 38-33.3-209.5.

It is the intent of this section to allow the association the widest possible latitude in methods and means of disclosure, while requiring that the information be readily available at no cost to unit owners at their convenience. Disclosure shall be accomplished by one of the following means: Posting on an internet web page with accompanying notice of the web address via first-class mail or e-mail; the maintenance of a literature table or binder at the association’s principal place of business; or mail or personal delivery. The cost of such distribution shall be accounted for as a common expense liability.

Notwithstanding section 38-33.3-117 (1.5)(c), this section shall not apply to a unit, or the owner thereof, if the unit is a time-share unit, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1377, § 7, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1) and (2)(e) amended, p. 1218, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2013:

(4) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1699, § 115, effective August 7; (1)(b) amended, (HB 13-1277), ch. 352, p. 2040, § 1, effective January 1, 2015.

L. 2020:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1057, § 65, effective June 30.

38-33.3-209.5.
Responsible governance policies - due process for imposition of fines - procedure for collection of delinquent accounts - definition.

To promote responsible governance, associations shall:

Maintain accurate and complete accounting records; and

Adopt policies, procedures, and rules and regulations concerning:

Collection of unpaid assessments;

Handling of conflicts of interest involving board members, which policies, procedures, and rules and regulations must include, at a minimum, the criteria described in subsection (4) of this section;

Conduct of meetings, which may refer to applicable provisions of the nonprofit code or other recognized rules and principles;

Enforcement of covenants and rules, including notice and hearing procedures and the schedule of fines;

Inspection and copying of association records by unit owners;

Investment of reserve funds;

Procedures for the adoption and amendment of policies, procedures, and rules;

Procedures for addressing disputes arising between the association and unit owners; and

When the association has a reserve study prepared for the portions of the community maintained, repaired, replaced, and improved by the association; whether there is a funding plan for any work recommended by the reserve study and, if so, the projected sources of funding for the work; and whether the reserve study is based on a physical analysis and financial analysis. For the purposes of this subparagraph (IX), an internally conducted reserve study shall be sufficient.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules and regulations to the contrary, the association may not fine any unit owner for an alleged violation unless:

The association has adopted, and follows, a written policy governing the imposition of fines; and

The policy includes a fair and impartial fact-finding process concerning whether the alleged violation actually occurred and whether the unit owner is the one who should be held responsible for the violation. This process may be informal but shall, at a minimum, guarantee the unit owner notice and an opportunity to be heard before an impartial decision maker.

As used in this paragraph (b), “impartial decision maker” means a person or group of persons who have the authority to make a decision regarding the enforcement of the association’s covenants, conditions, and restrictions, including its architectural requirements, and the other rules and regulations of the association and do not have any direct personal or financial interest in the outcome. A decision maker shall not be deemed to have a direct personal or financial interest in the outcome if the decision maker will not, as a result of the outcome, receive any greater benefit or detriment than will the general membership of the association.

If, as a result of the fact-finding process described in subsection (2) of this section, it is determined that the unit owner should not be held responsible for the alleged violation, the association shall not allocate to the unit owner’s account with the association any of the association’s costs or attorney fees incurred in asserting or hearing the claim. Notwithstanding any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association to the contrary, a unit owner shall not be deemed to have consented to pay such costs or fees.

The policies, procedures, and rules and regulations adopted by an association under subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section must, at a minimum:

Define or describe the circumstances under which a conflict of interest exists;

Set forth procedures to follow when a conflict of interest exists, including how, and to whom, the conflict of interest must be disclosed and whether a board member must recuse himself or herself from discussing or voting on the issue; and

Provide for the periodic review of the association’s conflict of interest policies, procedures, and rules and regulations.

The policies, procedures, or rules and regulations adopted under this subsection (4) must be in accordance with section 38-33.3-310.5.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules and regulations to the contrary or the absence of a relevant provision in the declaration, bylaws, articles, or rules or regulations, the association or a holder or assignee of the association’s debt, whether the holder or assignee of the association’s debt is an entity or a natural person, may not use a collection agency or take legal action to collect unpaid assessments unless the association or a holder or assignee of the association’s debt has adopted, and follows, a written policy governing the collection of unpaid assessments. The policy must, at a minimum, specify:

The date on which assessments must be paid to the entity and when an assessment is considered past due and delinquent;

Any late fees and interest the entity is entitled to impose on a delinquent unit owner’s account;

Any returned-check charges the entity is entitled to impose;

The circumstances under which a unit owner is entitled to enter into a payment plan with the entity pursuant to section 38-33.3-316.3 and the minimum terms of the payment plan mandated by that section;

That, before the entity turns over a delinquent account of a unit owner to a collection agency or refers it to an attorney for legal action, the entity must send the unit owner a notice of delinquency specifying:

The total amount due, with an accounting of how the total was determined;

Whether the opportunity to enter into a payment plan exists pursuant to section 38-33.3-316.3 and instructions for contacting the entity to enter into such a payment plan;

The name and contact information for the individual the unit owner may contact to request a copy of the unit owner’s ledger in order to verify the amount of the debt; and

That action is required to cure the delinquency and that failure to do so within thirty days may result in the unit owner’s delinquent account being turned over to a collection agency, a lawsuit being filed against the owner, the filing and foreclosure of a lien against the unit owner’s property, or other remedies available under Colorado law;

The method by which payments may be applied on the delinquent account of a unit owner; and

The legal remedies available to the entity to collect on a unit owner’s delinquent account pursuant to the governing documents of the entity and Colorado law.

As used in this subsection (5), “entity” means an association or a holder or assignee of the association’s debt, whether the holder or assignee of the association’s debt is an entity or a natural person.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1377, § 7, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), (1)(b)(VI), and (1)(b)(VII) amended and (1)(b)(VIII) added, p. 1219, § 7, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

(2) and (3) added, p. 556, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(b)(IX) added, (HB 09-1359), ch. 257, p. 1164, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1)(b)(II) amended and (4) added, (HB 11-1124), ch. 105, p. 328, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 2013:

(5) added, (HB 13-1276), ch. 351, p. 2035, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

38-33.3-209.6.
Executive board member education.

The board may authorize, and account for as a common expense, reimbursement of board members for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending educational meetings and seminars on responsible governance of unit owners’ associations. The course content of such educational meetings and seminars shall be specific to Colorado, and shall make reference to applicable sections of this article.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1377, § 7, effective January 1, 2006.

38-33.3-209.7.
Owner education.

The association shall provide, or cause to be provided, education to owners at no cost on at least an annual basis as to the general operations of the association and the rights and responsibilities of owners, the association, and its executive board under Colorado law. The criteria for compliance with this section shall be determined by the executive board.

Notwithstanding section 38-33.3-117 (1.5)(c), this section shall not apply to an association that includes time-share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1377, § 7, effective January 1, 2006.

38-33.3-210.
Exercise of development rights.

To exercise any development right reserved under section 38-33.3-205 (1)(h), the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration and, in a condominium or planned community, comply with the provisions of section 38-33.3-209. The declarant is the unit owner of any units thereby created. The amendment to the declaration must assign an identifying number to each new unit created and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units described in subsection (3) of this section, reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment must describe any common elements and any limited common elements thereby created and, in the case of limited common elements, designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by section 38-33.3-208.

Additional development rights not previously reserved may be reserved within any real estate added to the common interest community if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required by section 38-33.3-205 or 38-33.3-206, as the case may be, and, in a condominium or planned community, the plats and maps include all matters required by section 38-33.3-209. This provision does not extend the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration pursuant to section 38-33.3-205 (1)(h).

Whenever a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units, common elements, or both:

If the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of that unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain; and

If the declarant subdivides the unit into two or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

If the declaration provides, pursuant to section 38-33.3-205, that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a right of withdrawal:

If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser; and

If any portion of the real estate is subject to withdrawal, it may not be withdrawn after a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

If a declarant fails to exercise any development right within the time limit and in accordance with any conditions or fixed limitations described in the declaration pursuant to section 38-33.3-205 (1)(h), or records an instrument surrendering a development right, that development right shall lapse unless the association, upon the request of the declarant or the owner of the real estate subject to development right, agrees to an extension of the time period for exercise of the development right or a reinstatement of the development right subject to whatever terms, conditions, and limitations the association may impose on the subsequent exercise of the development right. The extension or renewal of the development right and any terms, conditions, and limitations shall be included in an amendment executed by the declarant or the owner of the real estate subject to development right and the association.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1723, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 648, § 13, effective April 30.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 481, § 7, effective July 1.